District of Columbia statutes.
15-363

Applicability.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, this subchapter applies to a foreign-country judgment to the extent that the judgment:

(1)

Grants or denies recovery of a sum of money; and

(2)

Under the law of the foreign country where rendered, is:

(A)

Final;

(B)

Conclusive; and

(C)

Enforceable.

(b)

This subchapter does not apply to a foreign-country judgment, even if the judgment grants or denies recovery of a sum of money, to the extent that the judgment is a:

(1)

Judgment for taxes;

(2)

Fine or other penalty; or

(3)

Judgment for:

(A)

Divorce;

(B)

Support or maintenance; or

(C)

Other judgment rendered in connection with domestic relations.

(c)

A party seeking recognition of a foreign-country judgment has the burden of establishing that this subchapter applies to the foreign-country judgment.

Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-86, § 2(b), 58 DCR 11186
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 3 of the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act.